Alabama, session 2026rs, HB220.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) As used in this section, "board" means
any board, authority, or commission comprised of individual
members, of which some or all members are appointed, as
established under state law.
(b) Any individual appointed to a board by the
Governor, the Lieutenant Governor, the Speaker of the House of
Representatives, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the
Minority Leader of the House of Representatives, or the
Minority Leader of the Senate pursuant to a state law that
authorizes the appointment shall serve at the pleasure of the
Governor, the Speaker of the House, the President Pro Tempore
of the Senate, the House Minority Leader, or the Senate
Minority Leader, as the case may be.
(c)(1) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary,
including any law providing a specific removal process, the
Governor, the Lieutenant Governor, the Speaker of the House of
Representatives, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the
Minority Leader of the House of Representatives, and the
Page 1

Minority Leader of the House of Representatives, and the
HB220 Enrolled
Minority Leader of the Senate, at any time, may remove any
board member over which he or she has appointing authority.
(2) Any board member removed pursuant to subdivision
(1) shall be replaced in accordance with existing law by the
respective appointing authority, provided the new member meets
the applicable qualifications to serve on the board, as set
forth in the relevant state law.
(d) This section does not authorize the Governor to
remove any individual whom the Governor previously appointed
to fill a vacancy of an elected office.
(e) This section does not apply to the Alabama State
Port Authority, the State Ethics Commission, or to the
governing board of any two-year or four-year public
institution of higher education.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2

1, 2026.
HB220 Enrolled










________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 10-Feb-26, as amended.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 08-Apr-26 Amended and Passed

House 08-Apr-26 Concurred in Senate
Amendment


Page 3